dictionaries/fr_FR/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX aC Y 12
SFX aC rai rai/n'q'j' irai
SFX aC rai ras/n'q' irai
SFX aC rai ra/n'q' irai
SFX aC rai rons/n'q' irai
SFX aC rai rez/n'q' irai
SFX aC rai ront/n'q' irai
SFX aC rai rais/n'q'j' irai
SFX aC rai rais/n'q' irai
SFX aC rai rait/n'q' irai
SFX aC rai rions/n'q' irai
SFX aC rai riez/n'q' irai
SFX aC rai raient/n'q' irai

SFX aD Y 48
SFX aD voyer voyer/n'q'd'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyant/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyé/q' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyés/q' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyée/q' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyées/q' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voie/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voies/n'q'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voie/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyons/n'q'l't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyez/n'q'l'm' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voient/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyais/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyais/n'q'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyait/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyions/n'q'l't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyiez/n'q'l'm' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyaient/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyai/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyas/n'q'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voya/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyâmes/n'q'l't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyâtes/n'q'l'm' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyèrent/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verrai/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verras/n'q'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verra/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verrons/n'q'l't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verrez/n'q'l'm' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verront/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verrais/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verrais/n'q'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verrait/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verrions/n'q'l't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verriez/n'q'l'm' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verraient/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voie/n'j'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voies/n'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voie/n'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyions/n'l't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyiez/n'l'm' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voient/n'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyasse/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyasses/n'q'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyât/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyassions/n'q'l't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyassiez/n'q'l'm' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyassent/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer

SFX aE Y 6
SFX aE direr direr/n'q'd'l'm't's' direr
SFX aE direr dirant/n'q'l'm't's' direr
SFX aE direr diré/q' direr
SFX aE direr dirés/q' direr
SFX aE direr dirée/q' direr
SFX aE direr dirées/q' direr

SFX aF N 16
SFX aF cerner cerner er
SFX aF cerner cernant er
SFX aF cerner cerné er
SFX aF cerner cernés er
SFX aF cerner cernée er
SFX aF cerner cernées er
SFX aF cerner cerne er
SFX aF cerner cernent er
SFX aF cerner cernait er
SFX aF cerner cernaient er
SFX aF cerner cerna er
SFX aF cerner cernèrent er
SFX aF cerner cernera er
SFX aF cerner cerneront er
SFX aF cerner cernerait er
SFX aF cerner cerneraient er

SFX aG Y 15
SFX aG er er/n'q'd'm't' er
SFX aG er ant/n'q'm't' er
SFX aG er é er
SFX aG er e/n'q'm't' er
SFX aG er ent/n'q'm't' er
SFX aG er ait/n'q'm't' er
SFX aG er aient/n'q'm't' er
SFX aG er a/n'q'm't' er
SFX aG er èrent/n'q'm't' er
SFX aG er ât/n'q'm't' er
SFX aG er assent/n'q'm't' er
SFX aG er era/n'q'm't' er
SFX aG er eront/n'q'm't' er
SFX aG er erait/n'q'm't' er
SFX aG er eraient/n'q'm't' er

SFX aY N 65
SFX aY neler neler neler
SFX aY neler nelant neler
SFX aY neler nelé neler
SFX aY éneler énelle éneler
SFX aY èneler énèle èneler
SFX aY éneler énelles éneler
SFX aY èneler énèles èneler
SFX aY éneler énelle éneler
SFX aY èneler énèle èneler
SFX aY neler nelons neler
SFX aY neler nelez neler
SFX aY éneler énellent éneler
SFX aY èneler énèlent èneler
SFX aY neler nelais neler
SFX aY neler nelais neler
SFX aY neler nelait neler
SFX aY neler nelions neler
SFX aY neler neliez neler
SFX aY neler nelaient neler
SFX aY neler nelai neler
SFX aY neler nelas neler
SFX aY neler nela neler
SFX aY neler nelâmes neler
SFX aY neler nelâtes neler
SFX aY neler nelèrent neler
SFX aY éneler énellerai éneler
SFX aY èneler énèlerai èneler
SFX aY éneler énelleras éneler
SFX aY èneler énèleras èneler
SFX aY éneler énellera éneler
SFX aY èneler énèlera èneler
SFX aY éneler énellerons éneler
SFX aY èneler énèlerons èneler
SFX aY éneler énellerez éneler
SFX aY èneler énèlerez èneler
SFX aY éneler énelleront éneler
SFX aY èneler énèleront èneler
SFX aY éneler énellerais éneler
SFX aY èneler énèlerais èneler
SFX aY éneler énellerais éneler
SFX aY èneler énèlerais èneler
SFX aY éneler énellerait éneler
SFX aY èneler énèlerait èneler
SFX aY éneler énellerions éneler
SFX aY èneler énèlerions èneler
SFX aY éneler énelleriez éneler
SFX aY èneler énèleriez èneler
SFX aY éneler énelleraient éneler
SFX aY èneler énèleraient èneler
SFX aY éneler énelle éneler
SFX aY èneler énèle èneler
SFX aY éneler énelles éneler
SFX aY èneler énèles èneler
SFX aY éneler énelle éneler
SFX aY èneler énèle èneler
SFX aY neler nelions neler
SFX aY neler neliez neler
SFX aY éneler énellent éneler
SFX aY èneler énèlent èneler
SFX aY neler nelasse neler
SFX aY neler nelasses neler
SFX aY neler nelât neler
SFX aY neler nelassions neler
SFX aY neler nelassiez neler
SFX aY neler nelassent neler

SFX aZ N 65
SFX aZ teler teler teler
SFX aZ teler telant teler
SFX aZ teler telé teler
SFX aZ ételer ételle ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèle èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételles ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèles èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételle ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèle èteler
SFX aZ teler telons teler
SFX aZ teler telez teler
SFX aZ ételer étellent ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlent èteler
SFX aZ teler telais teler
SFX aZ teler telais teler
SFX aZ teler telait teler
SFX aZ teler telions teler
SFX aZ teler teliez teler
SFX aZ teler telaient teler
SFX aZ teler telai teler
SFX aZ teler telas teler
SFX aZ teler tela teler
SFX aZ teler telâmes teler
SFX aZ teler telâtes teler
SFX aZ teler telèrent teler
SFX aZ ételer étellerai ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlerai èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételleras ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèleras èteler
SFX aZ ételer étellera ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlera èteler
SFX aZ ételer étellerons ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlerons èteler
SFX aZ ételer étellerez ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlerez èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételleront ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèleront èteler
SFX aZ ételer étellerais ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlerais èteler
SFX aZ ételer étellerais ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlerais èteler
SFX aZ ételer étellerait ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlerait èteler
SFX aZ ételer étellerions ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlerions èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételleriez ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèleriez èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételleraient ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèleraient èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételle ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèle èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételles ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèles èteler
SFX aZ ételer ételle ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèle èteler
SFX aZ teler telions teler
SFX aZ teler teliez teler
SFX aZ ételer étellent ételer
SFX aZ èteler étèlent èteler
SFX aZ teler telasse teler
SFX aZ teler telasses teler
SFX aZ teler telât teler
SFX aZ teler telassions teler
SFX aZ teler telassiez teler
SFX aZ teler telassent teler

SFX f0 Y 45
SFX f0 ir ir ir
SFX f0 ir issant ir
SFX f0 ir i ir
SFX f0 ir is ir
SFX f0 ir is ir
SFX f0 ir it ir
SFX f0 ir issons ir
SFX f0 ir issez ir
SFX f0 ir issent ir
SFX f0 ir issais ir
SFX f0 ir issais ir
SFX f0 ir issait ir
SFX f0 ir issions ir
SFX f0 ir issiez ir
SFX f0 ir issaient ir
SFX f0 ir is ir
SFX f0 ir is ir
SFX f0 ir it ir
SFX f0 ir îmes ir
SFX f0 ir îtes ir
SFX f0 ir irent ir
SFX f0 ir irai ir
SFX f0 ir iras ir
SFX f0 ir ira ir
SFX f0 ir irons ir
SFX f0 ir irez ir
SFX f0 ir iront ir
SFX f0 ir irais ir
SFX f0 ir irais ir
SFX f0 ir irait ir
SFX f0 ir irions ir
SFX f0 ir iriez ir
SFX f0 ir iraient ir
SFX f0 ir isse ir
SFX f0 ir isses ir
SFX f0 ir isse ir
SFX f0 ir issions ir
SFX f0 ir issiez ir
SFX f0 ir issent ir
SFX f0 ir isse ir
SFX f0 ir isses ir
SFX f0 ir ît ir
SFX f0 ir issions ir
SFX f0 ir issiez ir
SFX f0 ir issent ir
