dictionaries/fr_FR/fr.dic
adirer/aE
bannir/f0f+()
barrir/f0()
blanchir/f0f+()
blettir/f0()
bleuir/f0f+()
blondir/f0f+()
blottir/f0f+()
blêmir/f0f+()
bondir/f0()
bouffir/f0f+()
brandir/f0f+()
bruir/f0f+()
brunir/f0f+()
bâtir/f0f+()
bénir/f0f+()
calmir/f0()
candir/f0f+()
catir/f0f+()
chancir/f0f+()
chauvir/f0()
choisir/f0f+()
chérir/f0f+()
clapir/f0f+()
compatir/f0()
concerner/aF()
convertir/f0f+()
cotir/f0f+()
croupir/f0()
crèneler/aY()
crèteler/aZ()
créneler/aY()
crépir/f0f+()
crételer/aZ()
cônir/f0f+()
dessaisir/f0f+()
dessertir/f0f+()
divertir/f0f+()
doucir/f0f+()
durcir/f0f+()
débleuir/f0f+()
débâtir/f0f+()
décatir/f0f+()
décrépir/f0f+()
définir/f0f+()
défleurir/f0f+()
défléchir/f0f+()
défraichir/f0f+()
défraîchir/f0f+()
dégarnir/f0f+()
dégauchir/f0f+()
déglutir/f0f+()
dégourdir/f0f+()
dégrossir/f0f+()
déguerpir/f0f+()
déjaunir/f0f+()
démaigrir/f0f+()
démolir/f0f+()
démunir/f0f+()
dénantir/f0f+()
dépolir/f0f+()
dépérir/f0()
déraidir/f0f+()
dérougir/f0f+()
désassortir/f0f+()
désemplir/f0f+()
désengourdir/f0f+()
désenlaidir/f0f+()
désinvestir/f0f+()
désobéir/f0()
désunir/f0f+()
désépaissir/f0f+()
désétablir/f0f+()
déverdir/f0()
dévernir/f0f+()
envoyer/aD
faiblir/f0()
farcir/f0f+()
finir/f0f+()
fleurir/f0f+()
fléchir/f0f+()
flétrir/f0f+()
forcir/f0()
fouir/f0f+()
fourbir/f0f+()
fournir/f0f+()
fraichir/f0()
franchir/f0f+()
fraîchir/f0()
froidir/f0()
frémir/f0()
fuir/f0f+()
garantir/f0f+()
garnir/f0f+()
gauchir/f0f+()
gaudir/f0f+()
glapir/f0f+()
glatir/f0()
grandir/f0f+()
gravir/f0f+()
grossir/f0f+()
guérir/f0f+()
gémir/f0f+()
havir/f0f+()
hennir/f0()
honnir/f0f+()
hourdir/f0f+()
incomber/aG
irai/aC
jaillir/f0()
jaunir/f0f+()
jouir/f0()
languir/f0f+()
lotir/f0f+()
louchir/f0()
maigrir/f0f+()
matir/f0f+()
meurtrir/f0f+()
mincir/f0()
moisir/f0f+()
moitir/f0f+()
mollir/f0f+()
mugir/f0f+()
munir/f0f+()
murir/f0f+()
mégir/f0f+()
mûrir/f0f+()
nantir/f0f+()
noircir/f0f+()
nordir/f0()
nourrir/f0f+()
pervertir/f0f+()
polir/f0f+()
pourrir/f0f+()
prédéfinir/f0f+()
prémunir/f0f+()
préétablir/f0f+()
punir/f0f+()
pâlir/f0f+()
pâtir/f0()
périr/f0()
pétrir/f0f+()
rabonnir/f0f+()
rabougrir/f0f+()
raccourcir/f0f+()
racornir/f0f+()
radoucir/f0f+()
raffermir/f0f+()
rafraichir/f0f+()
rafraîchir/f0f+()
ragaillardir/f0f+()
raidir/f0f+()
rajeunir/f0f+()
ralentir/f0f+()
ramollir/f0f+()
rancir/f0f+()
raplatir/f0f+()
rapointir/f0f+()
rappointir/f0f+()
rassir/f0f+()
ravilir/f0f+()
ravir/f0f+()
reblanchir/f0f+()
rebondir/f0f+()
rebâtir/f0f+()
rechampir/f0f+()
reconvertir/f0f+()
recrépir/f0f+()
redéfinir/f0f+()
redémolir/f0f+()
refleurir/f0f+()
refroidir/f0f+()
regarnir/f0f+()
regrossir/f0()
rejaillir/f0()
rembrunir/f0f+()
remplir/f0f+()
renchérir/f0f+()
renformir/f0f+()
renvoyer/aD
repartir/f0f+()
repolir/f0f+()
resalir/f0f+()
resplendir/f0()
ressaisir/f0f+()
ressortir/f0()
ressurgir/f0()
resurgir/f0()
retentir/f0()
reverdir/f0f+()
revernir/f0f+()
roidir/f0f+()
rondir/f0f+()
rosir/f0f+()
rougir/f0f+()
rouir/f0f+()
roussir/f0f+()
roustir/f0f+()
rugir/f0f+()
réagir/f0()
réassortir/f0f+()
réchampir/f0f+()
réfléchir/f0f+()
régir/f0f+()
réinvestir/f0f+()
réjouir/f0f+()
rélargir/f0f+()
répartir/f0f+()
résulter/aG
rétablir/f0f+()
rétroagir/f0()
rétrécir/f0f+()
réunir/f0f+()
réussir/f0f+()
rôtir/f0f+()
saisir/f0f+()
salir/f0f+()
saurir/f0f+()
serfouir/f0f+()
sertir/f0f+()
subir/f0f+()
subvertir/f0f+()
superfinir/f0f+()
surenchérir/f0()
surgir/f0()
surir/f0()
sévir/f0()
tapir/f0f+()
tarir/f0f+()
tartir/f0()
ternir/f0f+()
terrir/f0()
tiédir/f0f+()
trahir/f0f+()
transir/f0f+()
travestir/f0f+()
vagir/f0()
verdir/f0f+()
vernir/f0f+()
vieillir/f0f+()
vioquir/f0()
vomir/f0f+()
vrombir/f0()
